South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5367.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-5670(E)(1) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (1) A person or entity may dispose of a vehicle to a demolisher or secondary metals recycler without a title certificate, magistrate's order of sale, or sheriff's disposal authority certificate, if: (a) the vehicle is abandoned upon the person or entity's property or into the person or entity's possession, or if the person or entity is the owner of the vehicle and the vehicle's title certificate is faulty, lost, or destroyed; and (b) the vehicle: (i) is lawfully in the person or entity's possession; (ii) is twelvefive model years old or older; (iii) does not have a valid registration plate affixed; and (iv) has no engine or is otherwise totally inoperable. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----